Washington statutes.
RCW 2.32.070

Fees—Supreme court clerk, clerks of court of appeals.

The clerk of the supreme court and the clerks of the court of appeals shall collect the following fees for their official services:

Upon filing his or her first paper or record and making an appearance, the appellant or petitioner shall pay to the clerk of said court a docket fee of two hundred fifty dollars.

For copies of opinions, twenty cents per folio: PROVIDED, That counsel of record and criminal defendants shall be supplied a copy without charge.

For certificates showing admission of an attorney to practice law five dollars, except that there shall be no fee for an original certificate to be issued at the time of his or her admission.

For filing a petition for review of a court of appeals decision terminating review, two hundred dollars.

The foregoing fees shall be all the fees connected with the appeal or special proceeding.

No fees shall be required to be advanced by the state or any municipal corporation, or any public officer prosecuting or defending on behalf of such state or municipal corporation.

[ 1992 c 140 s 1; 1987 c 382 s 1; 1981 c 331 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 107 s 2; 1951 c 51 s 1; 1907 c 56 s 1, part; 1903 c 151 s 1, part; RRS s 497, part. Prior: 1893 c 130 s 1, part; Code 1881 s 2086, part; 1866 pp 94-99, part; 1863 pp 391-399, part; 1861 pp 34-42, part; 1854 pp 368-376, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1992 c 140: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect April 1, 1992." [ 1992 c 140 s 2.]

Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981—Purpose—1981 c 331: "Recognizing the value of providing the people of the state of Washington with justice delivered in an expeditious fashion, recognizing the need to assure the people of the state of Washington that the quality of our judicial system will not be placed in jeopardy, and recognizing the need to avoid congestion of the courts at all levels of our judicial system, the legislature hereby enacts this Court Congestion Reduction Act of 1981." [ 1981 c 331 s 1.]

Severability—1981 c 331: "If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1981 c 331 s 16.]

"Folio" defined: RCW 1.16.040.